Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska31-931
Sections; supplemental effect.

Sections 31-901 to 31-933 shall in no way interfere with or prevent the operation of any drainage district organized under the laws of this state or the construction of roads, road ditches, culverts, drains, or bridges in connection therewith but shall be supplemental and independent legislation.

Laws 1959, c. 132, § 31, p. 493.